Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1715
Isolated land; access; hearing; notice; service; posting.

When a hearing is to be held as provided in sections 39-1713 and 39-1714, the county board shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing to be given by posting notices thereof in three public places in the county at least ten days before the time fixed therefor. At least fifteen days' written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given to all of the owners and occupants of the lands through which the access road may pass. The notice shall be served personally or by leaving a copy thereof at the usual place of abode of each occupant of such lands and, whenever possible, by either registered or certified mail to the owners of such lands.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 15, p. 545;

Laws 1982, LB 239, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 6.